Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB819.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Short title.This act shall be known and may be cited as the Protecting Parents of Transgender Children Act.Section 2. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this act shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Child abuse." As defined in 23 Pa.C.S. § 6303(b.1) (relating to definitions)."Evidence-based." The use of current best evidence in making decisions about the care of an individual patient and integrating individual clinical expertise with the best available external clinical evidence from systematic research.12345678910111213141516171819 "Medically accurate." One of the following:(1) verified or supported by the weight of peer-reviewed medical research conducted in compliance with accepted scientific methods;(2) recognized as correct and objective by leading medical organizations with relevant expertise; or(3) recommended by or affirmed in the medical practice guidelines of a nationally recognized accrediting organization."Medically appropriate." Consistent with all of the following:(1) applicable legal, health and professional standards;(2) a patient's clinical and other circumstances; and(3) a patient's reasonably known wishes and beliefs.Section 3. Governmental prohibition.Neither the Commonwealth nor a political subdivision may prohibit a parent, legal custodian or legal guardian of a minor from obtaining, aiding the minor in obtaining or allowing the minor to obtain:(1) information that is medically accurate and medically appropriate for the minor; or(2) a medical service for the minor in a manner that is evidence-based and medically appropriate.Section 4. Protection from child abuse claims.It shall not constitute child abuse for a parent, legal custodian or legal guardian of a minor to obtain, aid the minor in obtaining or allow the minor to obtain:(1) information that is medically accurate and medically appropriate for the minor; or(2) a medical service for the minor in a manner that is 20250SB0819PN0890 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 evidence-based and medically appropriate.Section 5. Effective date.This act shall take effect immediately.20250SB0819PN0890 - 3 - 123